Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,155
Articles of amendment.

(MBCA 10.06) After an
amendment to the articles of incorporation has been adopted and approved in
the manner required by the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act and by
the articles of incorporation, the corporation shall deliver to the Secretary
of State, for filing, articles of amendment, which shall set forth:

(1) The name of the corporation;

(2) The text of each
amendment adopted, or the information required by subdivision (k)(5) of section
21-203;

(3)
If an amendment provides for an exchange, reclassification, or cancellation
of issued shares, provisions for implementing the amendment if not contained
in the amendment itself, which may be made dependent upon facts objectively
ascertainable outside the articles of amendment in accordance with subdivision
(k)(5) of section 21-203;

(4)
The date of each amendment's adoption; and

(5) If an amendment:

(i) Was adopted by the incorporators
or board of directors without shareholder approval, a statement that the amendment
was duly approved by the incorporators or by the board of directors, as the
case may be, and that shareholder approval was not required;

(ii) Required approval
by the shareholders, a statement that the amendment was duly approved by the
shareholders in the manner required by the act and by the articles of incorporation;
or

(iii)
Is being filed pursuant to subdivision (k)(5) of section 21-203, a statement
to that effect.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 155.